North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-11.1 Early Childhood Services

50-11.1-01.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to assure that children receiving early childhood services be provided food, shelter, safety, comfort, supervision, and learning experiences commensurate to their age and capabilities, so as to safeguard the health, safety, and development of those children.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 1; 1979, ch. 509, § 1; 1985, ch. 526, § 1.

50-11.1-02.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Authorized agent” means the human service zone, unless another entity is designated by the department.

“Child care center” means an early childhood program licensed to provide early childhood services to nineteen or more children.

“Department” means the department of human services.

“Drop-in care” means the care of children on a one-time, occasional, or unscheduled basis to meet the short-term needs of families.

“Early childhood program” means any program licensed under this chapter where early childhood services are provided for at least two hours a day for three or more days a week.

“Early childhood services” means the care, supervision, education, or guidance of a child or children, which is provided in exchange for money, goods, or other services. Early childhood services does not include:

Substitute parental child care provided pursuant to chapter 50-11.

Child care provided in any educational facility, whether public or private, in grade one or above.

Child care provided in a kindergarten which has been established pursuant to chapter 15.1-22 or a nonpublic elementary school program approved pursuant to section 15.1-06-06.1.

Child care, preschool, and prekindergarten services provided to children under six years of age in any educational facility through a program approved by the department.

Child care provided in facilities operated in connection with a church, business, or organization where children are cared for during periods of time not exceeding four continuous hours while the child’s parent is attending church services or is engaged in other activities, on the premises.

Schools or classes for religious instruction conducted by religious orders during the summer months for not more than two weeks, Sunday schools, weekly catechism, or other classes for religious instruction.

Summer resident or day camps for children which serve no children under six years of age for more than two weeks.

Sporting events, practices for sporting events, or sporting or physical activities conducted under the supervision of an adult.

Head start and early head start programs that are federally funded and meet federal head start performance standards.

Child care provided in a medical facility by medical personnel to children who are ill.

“Family child care” means a private residence licensed to provide early childhood services for no more than seven children at any one time, except that the term includes a residence licensed to provide early childhood services to two additional school-age children.

“Four-year old program” means an approved child care program operated by a public or private educational entity or an early childhood program designed to serve four-year olds.

“Group child care” means a child care program licensed to provide early childhood services for thirty or fewer children.

“Household member” means an adult living in the private residence out of which a program is operated, regardless of whether the adult is living there permanently or temporarily.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department.

“In-home provider” means any person who provides early childhood services to children in the children’s home.

“Licensed” means an early childhood program has the rights, authority, or permission granted by the department to operate and provide early childhood services.

“Multiple licensed program” means an early childhood program licensed to provide more than one type of early childhood services.

“Owner” or “operator” means the person who has legal responsibility for the early childhood program and premises.

“Parent” means an individual with the legal relationship of father or mother to a child or an individual who legally stands in place of a father or mother, including a legal guardian or custodian.

“Premises” means the indoor and outdoor areas approved for providing early childhood services.

“Preschool” means a program licensed to offer early childhood services, which follows a preschool curriculum and course of study designed primarily to enhance the educational development of the children enrolled and which serves no child for more than three hours per day.

“Public approval” means a nonlicensed early childhood program operated by a government entity that has self-certified that the program complies with this chapter.

“Registrant” means the holder of an in-home provider registration document issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.

“Registration” means the process whereby the department maintains a record of all in-home providers who have stated that they have complied or will comply with the prescribed standards and adopted rules.

“Registration document” means a written instrument issued by the department to publicly document that the registrant has complied with this chapter and the applicable rules and standards as prescribed by the department.

“School-age child care” means a child care program licensed to provide early childhood services on a regular basis for nineteen or more children aged five years through eleven years.

“School-age children” means children served under this chapter who are at least five years but less than twelve years of age.

“Self-declaration” means voluntary documentation of an individual providing early childhood services in a private residence for up to five children through the age of eleven, of which no more than three may be under the age of twenty-four months.

“Staff member” means an individual:

Who is an employee of an early childhood program or of an early childhood services provider under a self-declaration;

Whose activities involve the care, supervision, or guidance of children of an early childhood program; or

Who may have unsupervised access to children under the care, supervision, or guidance of an early childhood program or early childhood services provider under a self-declaration.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 2; 1979, ch. 509, § 2; 1981, ch. 491, § 1; 1985, ch. 526, § 2; 1987, ch. 578, § 1; 1989, ch. 582, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 28; 2005, ch. 418, § 5; 2005, ch. 419, § 1; 2009, ch. 422, § 3; 2013, ch. 375, § 1; 2013, ch. 376, § 1; 2015, ch. 339, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 348, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 110, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 406, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 358, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 368, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 421, effective September 1, 2022.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 375, S.L. 2013 became effective April 12, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 375, S.L. 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 376, S.L. 2013 became effective
July 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-11.1-02 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 406, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2245; and Section 110 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124.

50-11.1-02.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022 and through June 30, 2025]

As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Authorized agent” means the human service zone, unless another entity is designated by the department.

“Child care center” means an early childhood program licensed to provide early childhood services to nineteen or more children.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Drop-in care” means the care of children on a one-time, occasional, or unscheduled basis to meet the short-term needs of families.

“Early childhood program” means any program licensed under this chapter where early childhood services are provided for at least two hours a day for three or more days a week.

“Early childhood services” means the care, supervision, education, or guidance of a child or children, which is provided in exchange for money, goods, or other services. Early childhood services does not include:

Substitute parental child care provided pursuant to chapter 50-11.

Child care provided in any educational facility, whether public or private, in grade one or above.

Child care provided in a kindergarten which has been established pursuant to chapter 15.1-22 or a nonpublic elementary school program approved pursuant to section 15.1-06-06.1.

Child care, preschool, and prekindergarten services provided to children under six years of age in any educational facility through a program approved by the department.

Child care provided in facilities operated in connection with a church, business, or organization where children are cared for during periods of time not exceeding four continuous hours while the child’s parent is attending church services or is engaged in other activities, on the premises.

Schools or classes for religious instruction conducted by religious orders during the summer months for not more than two weeks, Sunday schools, weekly catechism, or other classes for religious instruction.

Summer resident or day camps for children which serve no children under six years of age for more than two weeks.

Sporting events, practices for sporting events, or sporting or physical activities conducted under the supervision of an adult.

Head start and early head start programs that are federally funded and meet federal head start performance standards.

Child care provided in a medical facility by medical personnel to children who are ill.

“Family child care” means a private residence licensed to provide early childhood services for no more than seven children at any one time, except that the term includes a residence licensed to provide early childhood services to two additional school-age children.

“Four-year old program” means an approved child care program operated by a public or private educational entity or an early childhood program designed to serve four-year olds.

“Group child care” means a child care program licensed to provide early childhood services for thirty or fewer children.

“Household member” means an adult living in the private residence out of which a program is operated, regardless of whether the adult is living there permanently or temporarily.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department.

“In-home provider” means any person who provides early childhood services to children in the children’s home.

“Licensed” means an early childhood program has the rights, authority, or permission granted by the department to operate and provide early childhood services.

“Multiple licensed program” means an early childhood program licensed to provide more than one type of early childhood services.

“Owner” or “operator” means the person who has legal responsibility for the early childhood program and premises.

“Parent” means an individual with the legal relationship of father or mother to a child or an individual who legally stands in place of a father or mother, including a legal guardian or custodian.

“Premises” means the indoor and outdoor areas approved for providing early childhood services.

“Preschool” means a program licensed to offer early childhood services, which follows a preschool curriculum and course of study designed primarily to enhance the educational development of the children enrolled and which serves no child for more than three hours per day.

“Public approval” means a nonlicensed early childhood program operated by a government entity that has self-certified that the program complies with this chapter.

“Registrant” means the holder of an in-home provider registration document issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.

“Registration” means the process whereby the department maintains a record of all in-home providers who have stated that they have complied or will comply with the prescribed standards and adopted rules.

“Registration document” means a written instrument issued by the department to publicly document that the registrant has complied with this chapter and the applicable rules and standards as prescribed by the department.

“School-age child care” means a child care program licensed to provide early childhood services on a regular basis for nineteen or more children aged five years through eleven years.

“School-age children” means children served under this chapter who are at least five years but less than twelve years of age.

“Self-declaration” means voluntary documentation of an individual providing early childhood services in a private residence for up to five children through the age of eleven, of which no more than three may be under the age of twenty-four months.

“Staff member” means an individual:

Who is an employee of an early childhood program or of an early childhood services provider under a self-declaration;

Whose activities involve the care, supervision, or guidance of children of an early childhood program; or

Who may have unsupervised access to children under the care, supervision, or guidance of an early childhood program or early childhood services provider under a self-declaration.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 2; 1979, ch. 509, § 2; 1981, ch. 491, § 1; 1985, ch. 526, § 2; 1987, ch. 578, § 1; 1989, ch. 582, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 28; 2005, ch. 418, § 5; 2005, ch. 419, § 1; 2009, ch. 422, § 3; 2013, ch. 375, § 1; 2013, ch. 376, § 1; 2015, ch. 339, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 348, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 110, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 406, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 358, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 368, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 421, effective September 1, 2022.

50-11.1-02.
Definitions.
[Effective July 1, 2025]

As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Authorized agent” means the human service zone, unless another entity is designated by the department.

“Child care center” means an early childhood program licensed to provide early childhood services to nineteen or more children.

“Department” means the department of health and human services.

“Drop-in care” means the care of children on a one-time, occasional, or unscheduled basis to meet the short-term needs of families.

“Early childhood program” means any program licensed under this chapter where early childhood services are provided for at least two hours a day for three or more days a week.

“Early childhood services” means the care, supervision, education, or guidance of a child or children, which is provided in exchange for money, goods, or other services. Early childhood services does not include:

Substitute parental child care provided pursuant to chapter 50-11.

Child care provided in any educational facility, whether public or private, in grade one or above.

Child care provided in a kindergarten which has been established pursuant to chapter 15.1-22 or a nonpublic elementary school program approved pursuant to section 15.1-06-06.1.

Child care, preschool, and prekindergarten services provided to children under six years of age in any educational facility through a program approved by the department.

Child care provided in facilities operated in connection with a church, business, or organization where children are cared for during periods of time not exceeding four continuous hours while the child’s parent is attending church services or is engaged in other activities, on the premises.

Schools or classes for religious instruction conducted by religious orders during the summer months for not more than two weeks, Sunday schools, weekly catechism, or other classes for religious instruction.

Summer resident or day camps for children which serve no children under six years of age for more than two weeks.

Sporting events, practices for sporting events, or sporting or physical activities conducted under the supervision of an adult.

Head start and early head start programs that are federally funded and meet federal head start performance standards.

Child care provided in a medical facility by medical personnel to children who are ill.

“Family child care” means a private residence licensed to provide early childhood services for no more than seven children at any one time, except that the term includes a residence licensed to provide early childhood services to two additional school-age children.

“Group child care” means a child care program licensed to provide early childhood services for thirty or fewer children.

“Household member” means an adult living in the private residence out of which a program is operated, regardless of whether the adult is living there permanently or temporarily.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department.

“In-home provider” means any person who provides early childhood services to children in the children’s home.

“Licensed” means an early childhood program has the rights, authority, or permission granted by the department to operate and provide early childhood services.

“Multiple licensed program” means an early childhood program licensed to provide more than one type of early childhood services.

“Owner” or “operator” means the person who has legal responsibility for the early childhood program and premises.

“Parent” means an individual with the legal relationship of father or mother to a child or an individual who legally stands in place of a father or mother, including a legal guardian or custodian.

“Premises” means the indoor and outdoor areas approved for providing early childhood services.

“Preschool” means a program licensed to offer early childhood services, which follows a preschool curriculum and course of study designed primarily to enhance the educational development of the children enrolled and which serves no child for more than three hours per day.

“Public approval” means a nonlicensed early childhood program operated by a government entity that has self-certified that the program complies with this chapter.

“Registrant” means the holder of an in-home provider registration document issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.

“Registration” means the process whereby the department maintains a record of all in-home providers who have stated that they have complied or will comply with the prescribed standards and adopted rules.

“Registration document” means a written instrument issued by the department to publicly document that the registrant has complied with this chapter and the applicable rules and standards as prescribed by the department.

“School-age child care” means a child care program licensed to provide early childhood services on a regular basis for nineteen or more children aged five years through eleven years.

“School-age children” means children served under this chapter who are at least five years but less than twelve years of age.

“Self-declaration” means voluntary documentation of an individual providing early childhood services in a private residence for up to five children through the age of eleven, of which no more than three may be under the age of twenty-four months.

“Staff member” means an individual:

Who is an employee of an early childhood program or of an early childhood services provider under a self-declaration;

Whose activities involve the care, supervision, or guidance of children of an early childhood program; or

Who may have unsupervised access to children under the care, supervision, or guidance of an early childhood program or early childhood services provider under a self-declaration.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 2; 1979, ch. 509, § 2; 1981, ch. 491, § 1; 1985, ch. 526, § 2; 1987, ch. 578, § 1; 1989, ch. 582, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 28; 2005, ch. 418, § 5; 2005, ch. 419, § 1; 2009, ch. 422, § 3; 2013, ch. 375, § 1; 2013, ch. 376, § 1; 2015, ch. 339, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 348, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 110, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 406, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 358, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 368, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 421, effective September 1, 2022.

50-11.1-02.1.
Number of children in program — How determined.

For the purpose of determining the number of children receiving early childhood services, all children present on the premises and under the age of twelve years must be counted. All children present are protected by this chapter regardless of whether money is received or goods or other services are received for their care.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 10; 1985, ch. 526, § 3; 2009, ch. 422, § 4.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-02.2.
Smoking prohibited on premises where early childhood services are provided.

As provided by section 23-12-10, smoking is not permitted on the premises where early childhood services are provided. For purposes of sections 23-12-09 and 23-12-10, a person providing early childhood services as a registrant or pursuant to a self-declaration is considered a child care facility subject to licensure by the department.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 2; 2013, ch. 375, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 375, S.L. 2013 became effective April 12, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of chapter 375, S.L. 2013.

50-11.1-02.3.
Early childhood services providers — Training on infant safe sleep practices.

The department shall adopt rules to require an early childhood service provider and the provider’s staff members who are responsible for the care or teaching of children under the age of one to annually complete a department approved sudden infant death syndrome prevention training course.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 340, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

50-11.1-03.
Operation of early childhood services program — License required — Fees.

A license for family child care is required if early childhood services are provided for four or more children ages twenty-four months and under, or six or seven children through age eleven at any one time which includes no more than three children under twenty-four months of age.

A license for group child care is required if early childhood services are provided for at least eight and no more than thirty children at any one time.

A license for a child care center is required if early childhood services are provided for more than thirty children at any one time.

Except as provided under subsection 5, a person may not establish or operate a family child care, group child care, preschool, school-age child care, or child care center unless licensed to do so by the department.

A governmental organization may not establish or operate a family child care, group child care, preschool, school-age child care, or child care center without first receiving public approval by certifying, to the department or the department’s authorized agent, that it has complied with all rules applicable to family child care, group child care, preschool, or school-age child care, or to child care centers.

A license is not required for onsite child care services located in the actual building in which the child’s parent is employed, not to exceed ten children per location.

An applicant for a license shall submit the following nonrefundable fees with the application:

The operator of a family child care applying for a license shall pay an annual license fee of twenty dollars or if the license is issued for a two-year period, a fee of thirty-five dollars.

The operator of a group child care applying for a license shall pay an annual license fee of twenty-five dollars or if the license is issued for a two-year period, a fee of forty-five dollars.

The operator of a preschool applying for a license shall pay an annual license fee of thirty dollars or if the license is issued for a two-year period, a fee of fifty-five dollars.

The operator of a child care center applying for a license shall pay an annual license fee of forty dollars or if the license is issued for a two-year period, a fee of seventy-five dollars.

The operator of a multiple licensed program applying for a license shall pay an annual license fee of fifty dollars or if the license is issued for a two-year period, a fee of ninety-five dollars.

An applicant for a license who currently holds a license or self-declaration shall submit the nonrefundable fees set forth in subsection 7 with the application at least sixty days and no more than ninety days before the expiration date of the applicant’s current license or self-declaration. If the nonrefundable fees and application are submitted less than sixty days before the expiration date of the applicant’s current license or self-declaration, the applicant shall submit with the application two times the nonrefundable fees set forth in subsection 7.

In addition to any criminal sanctions or other civil penalties that may be imposed pursuant to law, the operator of an early childhood program who, after being given written notice by the department or the department’s authorized agent, continues to provide early childhood services without a license as required by this section is subject to a civil penalty of fifty dollars per day for each day of operation without the required license. The civil penalty may be imposed by the courts or by the department through an administrative hearing pursuant to chapter 28-32.

All fees collected under subsections 7 and 8 must be paid to the department or the department’s authorized agent and must be used to defray the cost, to the department or the department’s authorized agent, of investigating, inspecting, and evaluating the applications or to provide training to providers of early childhood services.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 3; 1981, ch. 491, § 2; 1985, ch. 526, § 4; 1987, ch. 578, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2005, ch. 418, § 6; 2009, ch. 422, § 5; 2013, ch. 376, § 2; 2015, ch. 339, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 348, § 3, effective January 1, 2018.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 376, S.L. 2013 became effective
July 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-03.1.
Family child care home operator — Cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 422, § 27.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 27 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-04.
Application for license — Prerequisites for issuance — License granted — Term.

An application for operation of an early childhood program must be made on forms provided, in the manner prescribed, by the department. The department or the department’s authorized agent shall investigate the applicant’s activities and proposed standards of care and shall make an inspection of all premises to be used by the early childhood program applying for a license. The applicant for a license and the staff members, and, if the application is for a program that will be located in a private residence, every individual living in that residence must be investigated in accordance with the rules adopted by the department to determine whether any of them has a criminal record or has had a finding of services required for child abuse or neglect filed against them. The department may use the findings of the investigation to determine licensure. Except as otherwise provided, the department shall grant a license for the operation of an early childhood program within thirty days of receipt of a completed application and all supporting documents by the department and upon a showing:

The premises to be used are in fit and sanitary condition, are properly equipped to provide for the health and safety for all children, and are maintained according to rules adopted by the department;

Staff members are qualified to fulfill the duties required of the staff members according to the provisions of this chapter and standards prescribed for staff member qualifications by the rules of the department;

The application and supporting documents do not include any fraudulent or untrue representations;

The owner, operator, or applicant has not had a previous license or self-declaration denied or revoked within the twelve months before the date of the current application, unless waived by the department after the department considers the health and safety of children and the licensing history of the owner, operator, or applicant;

The owner, operator, or applicant has not had three or more previous licenses or self-declarations denied or revoked. The most recent revocation or denial may not have occurred within the three years immediately preceding the application date;

The program paid its license fees and any penalties and sanctions assessed against the program as required by sections 50-11.1-03 and 50-11.1-07.4;

The family child care owner or operator and staff members have received training and are currently certified in infant and pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation, including the use of an automated external defibrillator by the American heart association, American red cross, or other similar cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator training programs that are approved by the department, and are currently certified in first aid by a program approved by the department; and

The group child care, preschool, school-age child care, or child care center, at all times during which early childhood services are provided, staff members have received training and are currently certified in infant and pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation, including the use of an automated external defibrillator by the American heart association, American red cross, or other similar cardiopulmonary resuscitation and automated external defibrillator training programs that are approved by the department, and currently certified in first aid by a program approved by the department.

The license issued to the owner or operator of an early childhood program may not be effective for longer than two years.

The department may consider the applicant’s past licensing, self-declaration, and registration history in determining whether to issue a license.

The department may issue a provisional or restricted license in accordance with the rules of the department. The department shall consider issuing a provisional or restricted license before revoking a license. The department may require the owner or operator of an early childhood program to provide a compliance plan to address compliance issues with this chapter and rules of the department. The department shall review the compliance plan before issuing a provisional or restricted license. The department shall approve the provisional license if the department approves the compliance plan. The department may revoke a license if the owner and operator fail to comply with the department approved compliance plan or for any additional violations of this chapter or rules of the department.

The department shall notify the owner or operator that the owner or operator is required to post a notice of late application at the early childhood program premises if the department has not received a completed application and all supporting documents for licensure or self-declaration renewal at least thirty days before the expiration date of the early childhood program’s license.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 4; 1979, ch. 509, § 3; 1981, ch. 491, § 3; 1985, ch. 526, § 5; 1985, ch. 530, § 1; 1991, ch. 54, § 23; 2003, ch. 415, § 1; 2005, ch. 418, § 7; 2009, ch. 422, § 6; 2015, ch. 339, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 348, § 4, effective January 1, 2018; 2019, ch. 406, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 407, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-11.1-04 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 406, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2245; and Section 1 of Chapter 407, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2043.

50-11.1-04.1.
Operations of child care home — License. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 526, § 18.

50-11.1-05.
Operation of family day care home — Registration required — Issuance of registration certificate — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 491, § 19.

50-11.1-06.
In-home provider — Registration voluntary — Prerequisites for approval — Issuance of registration document — Term.

An in-home provider may apply for a registration document from the department. The department or the department’s authorized agent shall determine whether the applicant meets the standards and shall issue or deny a registration document based upon that determination. A registration document for an in-home provider may not be effective for longer than one year. The application and supporting documents may not include any fraudulent or untrue representations. The department may consider the early childhood services history of the applicant in determining issuance of a registration document. The department may investigate an applicant according to rules adopted by the department to determine whether the applicant has a criminal record or has been the subject of a finding of services required for child abuse and neglect. The department may issue a provisional in-home provider registration document in accordance with the rules of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 444, § 6; 1979, ch. 509, § 5; 1981, ch. 491, § 4; 2005, ch. 418, § 8; 2009, ch. 422, § 7; 2017, ch. 348, § 5, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-11.1-06.1.
Conviction not bar to licensure, self-declaration, or registration — Exceptions.

Conviction of an offense does not disqualify an individual from licensure, self-declaration, or registration under this chapter unless the department determines:

The offense has a direct bearing upon the individual’s ability to serve the public as the owner or operator of an early childhood program, holder of a self-declaration, or an in-home provider; or

Following conviction of any offense, the individual is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 130, § 64; 1981, ch. 491, § 5; 1985, ch. 526, § 6; 2009, ch. 422, § 10.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 10 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see

§ 12.1-01-04.

50-11.1-06.2.
Background investigations — Fees.

Upon a determination by the department a criminal history record check is appropriate, the following individuals are to obtain two sets of the individual’s fingerprints from a law enforcement agency or other local agency authorized to take fingerprints:

A provider holding or an applicant for early childhood services licensure, self-declaration, or in-home provider registration;

Emergency designees and staff members of providers holding and applicants for early childhood services licensure, self-declaration, or in-home provider registration; and

Household members of a residence out of which early childhood services are provided.

The individual shall request the agency to submit the fingerprints and a completed fingerprint card for each set to the division of children and family services of the department or to the department’s authorized agent.

If the division has no record of a determination of services required for child abuse or neglect, the division shall submit the fingerprints to the bureau of criminal investigation to determine if there is any criminal history record information regarding the applicant, household members, or staff members in accordance with section 12-60-24.

The results of the investigations must be forwarded to the division of children and family services of the department or to the department’s authorized agent.

The division may charge a fee not to exceed thirty dollars for the purpose of processing the application.

The division is not subject to the fee imposed under section 12-60-16.9 when requesting criminal history record information from the bureau of criminal investigation.

An agency that takes fingerprints as provided under this section may charge a reasonable fee to offset the costs of the fingerprinting.

The department may use background investigation findings to determine approval, denial, or revocation of an early childhood services license, self-declaration, or in-home registration.

Any individual who is providing early childhood services solely for the provider’s own children, grandchildren, nieces, nephews, and cousins as an in-home provider may not be required to submit to a criminal history record check authorized under section 50-06-01.9.

Unless an individual was separated from childcare employment for more than one hundred eighty days, a criminal history record check conducted under this section and subsection 3 of section 50-06-01.9 is valid for five years, after which the department shall require another criminal history record check.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 511, § 3; 2003, ch. 415, § 2; 2005, ch. 111, § 10; 2009, ch. 422, § 11; 2015, ch. 339, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 348, §§ 6, 7, effective January 1, 2018; 2019, ch. 406, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 4 of chapter 339, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 11 of chapter 422, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

Note.

Section 50-11.1-06.2 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 7 of Chapter 348, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2090; and Section 6 of Chapter 348, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2090.